Utah statutes.
10-7-29.   Railway companies to repave streets.
All railway companies shall be required to pave or repave at their own cost
all the space between their different rails and tracks and also a space two
feet wide outside of the outer rails of the outside tracks in any city or
town, including all sidetracks, crossings and turnouts used by such companies.
Where two or more companies occupy the same street or alley with separate
tracks each company shall be responsible for its proportion of the surface of
the street or alley occupied by all the parallel tracks as herein required.
Such paving or repaving by such railway companies shall be done at the same
time and shall be of the same material and character as the paving or repaving
of the streets or alleys upon which the track or tracks are located, unless
other material is specially ordered by the municipality. Such railway
companies shall be required to keep that portion of the street which they are
herein required to pave or repave in good and proper repair, using for that
purpose the same material as the street upon which the track or tracks are
laid at the point of repair or such other material as the governing body of
the city may require and order; and as streets are hereafter paved or repaved
street railway companies shall be required to lay in the best approved manner
a rail to be approved by the governing body of the city. The tracks of all
railway companies when located upon the streets or avenues of a city or town
shall be kept in repair and safe in all respects for the use of the traveling
public, and such companies shall be liable for all damages resulting by reason
of neglect to keep such tracks in repair, or for obstructing the streets. For
injuries to persons or property arising from the failure of any such company
to keep its tracks in proper repair and free from obstructions such company
shall be liable and the city or town shall be exempt from liability. The word
"railway companies" as used in this section shall be taken to mean and include
any persons, companies, corporations or associations owning or operating any
street or other railway in any city or town.
